Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2216.02
Report, defined.

Report means any communication, written, oral, or by electronic means, of assignment results transmitted to the client or a party authorized by the client upon completion of an assignment. Testimony related to assignment results is deemed to be an oral report.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2206;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 32;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 23;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 65.